Utah statutes.
59-2-301.3.   Definitions -- Assessment of real property subject to a low-
income housing covenant.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "low-income housing covenant" means an agreement:
(i)  between:
(A)  the Utah Housing Corporation; and
(B)  an owner of real property upon which residential housing is located; and
(ii)  in which the owner described in Subsection (1)(a)(i)(B) agrees to limit
the amount of rent that a renter may be charged for the residential housing;
and
(b)  "residential housing" means housing that:
(i)  is used:
(A)  for residential purposes; and
(B)  as a primary residence; and
(ii)  is rental property.
(2)  In assessing the fair market value of real property that is subject to a
low-income housing covenant, a county assessor shall include as part of the
assessment any effects the low-income housing covenant may have on the fair
market value of the real property.
